Washington statutes.
RCW 38.24.060

Employment and reemployment rights upon return from militia duty.

All members of the organized militia of Washington who are called to active state service or inactive duty shall, upon return from such duty, have those rights accorded under RCW 73.16.031, 73.16.035, 73.16.041, 73.16.051, and 73.16.061.

[ 1989 c 19 s 38; 1984 c 198 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 46 s 2.]